src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_saami_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - säämi: # i-stems # ok
    säämi+N+Sg+Nom: säämi
    säämi+N+Sg+Gen: säämi
    säämi+N+Sg+Acc: säämi
    säämi+N+Sg+Ill: sáámán
    säämi+N+Sg+Loc: säämist
    säämi+N+Sg+Com: saamijn
    säämi+N+Sg+Abe: sämittáá
    säämi+N+Ess:    säämmin
    säämi+N+Par:    säämmid
    säämi+N+Pl+Nom: säämih
    säämi+N+Pl+Gen: [saamij, samij]
    säämi+N+Pl+Acc: saamijd
    säämi+N+Pl+Ill: saamijd
    säämi+N+Pl+Loc: saamijn
    säämi+N+Pl+Com: [samijguin, samijgijn]
    säämi+N+Pl+Abe: samijttáá


  Noun - uási: # i-stems - ok
    uási+N+Sg+Nom: uási
    uási+N+Sg+Gen: uási
    uási+N+Sg+Acc: uási
    uási+N+Sg+Ill: uásán
    uási+N+Sg+Loc: uásist
    uási+N+Sg+Com: oosijn
    uási+N+Sg+Abe: uásittáá
    uási+N+Ess: uássin
    uási+N+Par: uássid
    uási+N+Pl+Nom: uásih
    uási+N+Pl+Gen: [oosij, osij]
    uási+N+Pl+Acc: oosijd
    uási+N+Pl+Ill: oosijd
    uási+N+Pl+Loc: oosijn
    uási+N+Pl+Com: [osijguin, osijgijn]
    uási+N+Pl+Abe: osijttáá

  Noun - pyerá: # lovnâsääni, ij oro nuávditmin uánánemnjuolgâdusâid
    pyerá+N+Sg+Nom:  pyerá 
    pyerá+N+Sg+Gen:  pyerá
    pyerá+N+Sg+Acc:  pyerá
    pyerá+N+Sg+Ill:  pyerán
    pyerá+N+Sg+Loc: pyerást
    pyerá+N+Sg+Com:  pyeráin
    pyerá+N+Sg+Abe:  pyeráttáá
    pyerá+N+Ess:  pyerán
    pyerá+N+Par:  pyerád
    pyerá+N+Pl+Nom:  pyeráh
    pyerá+N+Pl+Gen:  pyerái
    pyerá+N+Pl+Acc:  pyeráid
    pyerá+N+Pl+Ill:  pyeráid
    pyerá+N+Pl+Loc:  pyeráin
    pyerá+N+Pl+Com:  [pyeráiguin, pyeráigijn]
    pyerá+N+Pl+Abe:  pyeráittáá
